Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 41 Local Correctional Facilities
12-41-403. Police matron.

In all cities of the first class there shall be elected by the city council each year immediately after the organization thereof, after each annual election, one (1) police matron, who shall be at least twenty-five (25) years of age and a woman of good character and deportment, who shall hold office until her successor is elected and qualified.

The police matron shall be subject to the control of the chief of police and the mayor.

The police matron shall, before entering upon the duties of her office, take the oath of office provided by the Arkansas Constitution for civil officers.

She shall receive for her services such sum as may be prescribed by the ordinances of the city, not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per month, payable as the salaries of other police of the city are paid.

It shall be the duty of the police matron to take supervision of all girls or women who may be imprisoned in the city.

It shall be her duty to examine the persons of such prisoners, and the police matron shall conduct the examination in private, in the absence of men and boys.

She shall have exclusive control of the apartment for female prisoners, and it shall be her duty to keep the apartment in a clean and good sanitary condition.

The police matron shall do and perform all such duties in reference to female prisoners as may be provided by law or the lawful ordinances of such city.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter may impliedly repeal subchapter 3 of this chapter.

Cross References. County farm, §12-42-103.

County jail, use by municipality, §14-55-602.

Effective Dates. Acts 1877, No. 72, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1927, No. 366, § 4: became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 31, 1927. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist for the reason that there is no law, either special or general, now in force regulating the fees for keeping prisoners in Crawford County, hence this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 2007, No. 117, § 2: Feb. 16, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that county jails and regional detention facilities in this state lack sufficient operating funds; that therevenue derived as a result of this act will be used exclusively for the maintenance, operation, and capital expenditures of county jails and regional detention facilities, and that this act is necessary because the immediate collection of booking and administration fees will enable county jails and regional detention facilities to expedite efforts to increase the efficient administration of justice. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning location of county jails, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 881, § 2. The section was derived from Rev. Stat., ch. 81, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 6206; Pope's Dig., § 8169; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-401.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 72, §§ 1-4, p. 94; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7707, 7708; Pope's Dig., §§ 9850, 9851; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-703 — 46-706.

12-41-404. Expenses of county prisoners held in municipal jail.

The governing bodies in the various municipalities in this state may establish a daily fee to be charged counties for keeping prisoners of counties in the municipal jail.

The fee shall be based upon the reasonable expenses which the municipality incurs in keeping such prisoners in the municipal jail.

Counties whose prisoners are maintained in a municipal jail shall be responsible for paying the fee established.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 796, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-707.

12-41-405. Management of city jail populations.

(1)The chief of police, or his or her designee, may determine if a person convicted and sentenced to the city jail shall serve his or her sentence on electronic monitoring or on weekends if the determination does not conflict with any court orders.

If the chief of police, or his or her designee, determines that a person convicted and sentenced to the city jail shall serve his or her sentence on electronic monitoring or on weekends, an agreement shall be entered into between the chief of police, or his or her designee, and the convicted person outlining the conditions of the sentence.

If the convicted person fails to follow the conditions of the agreement, the chief of police, or his or her designee, may cancel the agreement and return the convicted person to the city jail by any lawful means necessary to serve the sentence.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 423, § 2.

Subchapter 5

— County Jails

12-41-501. [Repealed.]

The county sheriff of each county in this state shall have the custody, rule, and charge of the jail within his or her county and all prisoners committed in his or her county, and he or she may appoint a jailer for whose conduct he or she shall be responsible.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 81, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 6207; Pope's Dig., § 8170; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-402.

12-41-503. Management of local jail populations.

County sheriffs and other keepers or administrators of jails within the State of Arkansas are responsible for managing the populations and operations of their respective facilities in compliance with the laws and the Arkansas Constitution and within the requirements of the United States Constitution.

Neither a county sheriff nor another keeper or administrator of a jail shall refuse to accept any prisoner lawfully arrested or committed within the jurisdiction of the supporting agency of the jail except as necessary to limit prisoner population in compliance with subsection (a) of this section.

A county sheriff or his or her designee may determine if a convicted person sentenced to the county jail shall serve his or her sentence on electronic monitoring, on weekends, or by any other lawful alternative to continual detention in the county jail that rehabilitates the convicted person or benefits the county when this does not conflict with any court orders.

If a county sheriff or his or her designee determines that a convicted person sentenced to the county jail shall serve his or her sentence on electronic monitoring, on weekends, or by any other lawful alternative to continual detention in the county jail that rehabilitates the convicted person or benefits the county, an agreement shall be entered into between the county sheriff or his or her designee and the convicted person outlining the conditions of the sentence.

If the convicted person fails to follow the conditions of the agreement, the county sheriff or his or her designee may cancel the agreement and return the convicted person to the county jail by any lawful means necessary to serve the sentence.

When more than one (1) legal jurisdiction, that is, counties or municipalities, share a common jail, the participating jurisdictions may enter into agreements to share the operational costs of the jail.

When a shared jail is operated and a jurisdiction that is eligible to participate in the shared operation opts not to participate, then, in the event that the jurisdiction has prisoners committed to the shared jail, that jurisdiction may be required to pay fixed per diem charges, not to exceed actual costs, including capital costs, for each prisoner committed or housed in the jail.

An agreement with an agency or a jurisdiction not eligible for participation in a shared jail operation project may be made for the housing of prisoners provided the charges assessed do not exceed the actual costs, including capital costs.

Jails shall accept prisoners of the United States Government provided space and staffing are available and the delivering government agency agrees to pay a per diem charge not to exceed the actual costs, including capital costs.

Nothing in this section prohibits any jurisdiction from entering into a contractual agreement with a private organization for the operation of a jail facility.

Publisher's Notes. Former §12-41-503, concerning prisoners, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 1097, § 3. The section was derived from Rev. Stat., ch. 81, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 6208; Pope's Dig., § 8171; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-403.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment redesignated former (c) as present (c)(1); deleted “in counties with a population of over two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) persons” in (c)(1); and added (c)(2) and (c)(3).

The 2007 amendment inserted “or by any other lawful alternative to continual detention in the county jail that rehabilitates the inmate or benefits the county” in (c)(1) and (c)(2), and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment substituted “rehabilitates the convicted person” for “rehabilitates the inmate” in (c)(1) and (c)(2), and made stylistic changes.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1097, § 1; 1999, No. 754, § 1; 2005, No. 423, § 1; 2007, No. 300, § 1; 2009, No. 165, § 14.

12-41-504. Feeding and keeping prisoners.

The quorum court in each county shall prescribe the method and procedure for feeding and keeping prisoners confined in the county jail and shall provide for payment for food and services.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 342, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-404.1.

12-41-505. Expenses and support.

Every person who is committed to the common jail of the county by lawful authority for any criminal offense or misdemeanor, if he or she is convicted, shall pay the expenses in carrying him or her to jail and also for his or her support from the day of his or her initial incarceration for the whole time he or she remains there.

The expenses which accrue shall be paid as directed in the act regulating criminal proceedings.

A person convicted of a felony or a Class A misdemeanor shall be assessed a booking and administration fee of forty dollars ($40.00).

The booking and administration fee described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be assessed upon the conviction of a defendant and included in the judgment of conviction entered by the court.

If a court suspends imposition of sentence on a defendant or places him or her on probation and does not enter a judgment of conviction, the court shall impose the booking and administration fee as a cost.

The booking and administration fee assessed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be deposited into the county treasury by the collecting officer to be credited and used in the following manner:

Ten percent (10%) of each booking and administration fee collected shall be deposited into or credited to the county sheriff's office fund described in § 12-41-105 by the county treasurer, and then transferred by check on a monthly basis using a uniform remittance form provided by the Treasurer of State, to the Treasurer of State for the Law Enforcement Training Fund; and

The remaining funds shall be deposited into or credited to a special revenue fund and used for the maintenance, operation, and capital expenditures of a county jail or regional detention facility and for certificate pay for law enforcement and jailer personnel.

The property of the person shall be subject to the payment of the expenses and the booking and administration fee.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment inserted (b) and redesignated former (a) and (b) as (a)(1) and (a)(2); and added “and the booking and administration fee” at the end of (c).

The 2019 amendment, in the introductory language of (a)(1), substituted “is committed” for “may be committed”, and substituted “is convicted” for “shall be convicted”; substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “twenty dollars ($20.00)” in (b)(1); and rewrote (b)(3).

Circuit court did not err in ordering appellant to pay $6,706.22 to a county pursuant to its “pay for stay” ordinance; plain reading of this section, which allowed the county to recoup certain expenses, did not establish that it applied only to those persons incarcerated in the Department of Corrections.Wickham v. State, 2009 Ark. 357, 324 S.W.3d 344 (2009).

Cited: Union County v. Warner Brown Hosp., 297 Ark. 460, 762 S.W.2d 798 (1989).

Counties shall give priority to in-county municipalities over contracts for out-of-county prisoners.

In a dispute between a city and a county over the city's payment to the county of fees for incarcerating offenders in the county jail who were arrested by city police, the trial court erred in its interpretation of the term “prisoners of municipalities” in this section as limited to persons detained for violations of municipal ordinances; instead, the term includes offenders city police arrest and deliver to the county jail from intake until (a) charging on a felony, (b) sentencing on a misdemeanor, or (c) release on a municipal-ordinance violation.Miss. Cty. v. City of Blytheville, 2018 Ark. 50, 538 S.W.3d 822 (2018).

In a dispute between a city and a county over the city's payment to the county of fees for incarcerating offenders in the county jail who were arrested by city police, the city could claim no offset of jail taxes paid by city residents against fees the city owed the county, because (1) the city had no standing, as the city did not show it was injured by paying the tax, and entities or citizens who paid the tax were not joined, and (2) a credit for a county tax paid by city residents, who were also county residents, was illogical and statutorily unauthorized.Miss. Cty. v. City of Blytheville, 2018 Ark. 50, 538 S.W.3d 822 (2018).

In a dispute between a city and a county over the city's payment to the county of fees for incarcerating offenders in the county jail who were arrested by city police, res judicata did not bar the trial court's definition of the term “prisoners of municipalities” in this section, because (1) the interpretation did not bind a city that was not a party to prior litigation, and (2) the public interest exception to res judicata was applicable.Miss. Cty. v. City of Blytheville, 2018 Ark. 50, 538 S.W.3d 822 (2018).

Complaint that charged sheriff with violating county jail inmates' constitutional right to reasonably safe conditions during confinement could not be dismissed since it was possible for the inmates to prove that the sheriff breached his duty to provide a reasonably safe place of confinement imposed by the United States Constitution, this section, and §12-41-502. Hamilton v. Covington, 445 F. Supp. 195 (W.D. Ark. 1978).

Individual quorum court members could be held liable in damages for injuries sustained by inmates of county jail only if they knew or reasonably should have known that county jail inmates have a constitutional right to have a jailer present for all except an insubstantial amount of time and knowingly took actions violative of this right. Hamilton v. Covington, 445 F. Supp. 195 (W.D. Ark. 1978).

No quorum court member or the county judge could be found liable in damages for injuries resulting from a fire in the county jail unless he personally knew that the jail was left completely unattended for more than insubstantial amounts of time or unless the sheriff notified the court of the need for an additional jailer and the individual court member, fully informed, deliberately voted against appropriating the necessary funds, if the funds could have been appropriated or allocated without violating any statutory provision. Hamilton v. Covington, 445 F. Supp. 195 (W.D. Ark. 1978).

Ark. L. Rev.

Gingerich, The Arkansas Grand Jury, etc., 40 Ark. L. Rev. 55.

Since the responsibility for the condition of county jails rests with the sheriff under §12-41-502 and with the grand jury under this section, members of the quorum court could not be found liable in damages for injuries resulting from a fire in the county jail unless they personally knew that the jail was left completely unattended for more than insubstantial amounts of time. Hamilton v. Covington, 445 F. Supp. 195 (W.D. Ark. 1978).

In all cases in which a prisoner is committed from another county for a criminal offense under the provisions of this subchapter, the county shall pay the expenses in the same manner as if the commitment had been in the county where the offense was committed.

In civil suits the plaintiff or defendant shall pay the expenses in the same manner as if the imprisonment had taken place in the county where the suit was commenced.

The due process clause does not in itself protect a convicted prisoner from transfer between jails in the state prison systems, nor does it protect a pretrial detainee from transfer from one prison to another; however, a detainee's constitutional rights may be infringed where the transfer interferes with his right to assistance of counsel, where the state has created a liberty interest in remaining in a particular facility, or where the nature and duration of the new form of incarceration exceeds the original purpose for which he was detained. Ervin v. Busby, 992 F.2d 147 (8th Cir.), cert. denied, 510 U.S. 879, 114 S. Ct. 220, 126 L. Ed. 2d 176 (1993).

This section is directory. Hart v. Howard County, 44 Ark. 560 (1884).

After a transfer, evidence of actual prejudice is necessary to show interference with the right to counsel. Ervin v. Busby, 992 F.2d 147 (8th Cir.), cert. denied, 510 U.S. 879, 114 S. Ct. 220, 126 L. Ed. 2d 176 (1993).

When a prisoner is taken for safekeeping to the jail of some county not in the same circuit, the county from whose jail he is so taken is liable for his expenses there, including necessary medical attention, to the same extent as if committed to a jail in the same circuit. Hart v. Howard County, 44 Ark. 560 (1884).

This section does not contain mandatory language which limits prison officials' discretion, and thus it does not create a protectable liberty interest. Ervin v. Busby, 992 F.2d 147 (8th Cir.), cert. denied, 510 U.S. 879, 114 S. Ct. 220, 126 L. Ed. 2d 176 (1993).

Cited: Martin v. State, 162 Ark. 282, 257 S.W. 752 (1924).

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 879, § 16: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the jail facilities in a number of counties in this state are inadequate or in many instances do not meet the standards for public jails as provided by law and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to establish a procedure whereby counties, in the manner authorized in this act, may issue county jail and jail facilities revenue bonds to secure funds for construction, reconstruction, improvement, expansion, repair, and equipping of county jails and jail facilities. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 81, §§ 5, 7; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6209, 6212; Pope's Dig., §§ 8172, 8175; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-404, 46-407; Acts 1999, No. 1128, § 1; 2007, No. 117, § 1; 2019, No. 372, § 2.

12-41-506. Expenses of municipal prisoners held in county jails.

(1)In the absence of an agreement on jail costs between a county and all municipalities having law enforcement agencies in the county, the quorum court in a county in this state may by ordinance establish a daily fee to be charged municipalities for keeping prisoners of municipalities in the county jail.

The fee shall be based upon the reasonable expenses which the county incurs in keeping such prisoners in the county jail.

(1)Municipalities whose prisoners are maintained in the county jail shall be responsible for paying the fee established by the quorum court in the county.

When a person is sentenced to a county jail for violating a municipal ordinance, the municipality shall be responsible for paying the fee established by an agreement or ordinance of the quorum court in the county.

Municipalities may appropriate funds to assist the county in the maintenance and operation of the county jail.

(1)Each county sheriff shall bill each municipality monthly for the cost of keeping prisoners in the county jail.

Each county sheriff shall remit to the county treasurer monthly the fees collected under this section, and such fees shall be credited to the county general fund.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 796, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-419.1; Acts 1993, No. 516, § 1; 1993, No. 1290, § 1; 1995, No. 555, § 1.

12-41-507. Securing of county jail.

Whenever the county sheriff of any county of this state shall be of the opinion that the jail of his or her county is insufficient to secure the prisoners that may be therein committed, it shall be his or her duty to give notice thereof to the county court.

If the jail cannot be immediately repaired and made safe and secure, the county court may, by an order to be entered on its minutes, direct the county sheriff to employ guards sufficient for the guarding and safe-keeping of the prisoners. However, the guards shall in no instance exceed three (3) persons.

In case the insufficiency in the opinion of the county sheriff shall occur in vacation of the county court, it shall be the duty of the county sheriff to give notice to the county judge of such county and if the jail cannot be immediately repaired and made safe and secure, the county judge may, by an order in writing, direct the county sheriff to employ guards for the purpose, not exceeding the number provided for in subsection (b) of this section, for such length of time as he or she may deem necessary, not exceeding the second day of the actual meeting of the county court at any regular, adjourned, or special term.

A guard shall not be allowed a sum to exceed two dollars ($2.00) for each twenty-four (24) hours.

History.

Acts 1877, No. 72, § 1, p. 72; C. & M. Dig., § 6217; Pope's Dig., § 8180; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-412.

12-41-508. Duty of grand jury.

It shall be the duty of the grand jury at each term of the circuit court to visit the jail of their county, to examine into the condition thereof, to inquire into the treatment of the prisoners, and to report thereon to the circuit court.

In their report the grand jury shall recommend improvements as may be necessary to put the jail in complete repair and render it secure.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 81, § 8; C. & M. Dig., § 6213; Pope's Dig., § 8176; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-408.

12-41-509. Commitment to jail of another county.

(1)The county sheriff of any county in this state, where there is no jail in his or her county or the jail of the county is insufficient, may commit any person in his or her custody, either on criminal or civil process, to a jail in some other county located in this state, provided the county sheriff of the other county consents to receiving the person in custody.

It shall be the duty of the county sheriff or keeper of the jail of the county to receive the person so committed and keep him or her safely, subject to the order of the circuit court of the county in which the prisoner was committed.

It shall be the duty of the county sheriff committing any person to another county for any criminal offense to notify the circuit court judge of the county in which the prisoner is to be tried of the committing of the person to the jail of the other county. The county sheriff shall transmit to the judge at the same time the cause of the capture and detention of the person.

(1)It shall be the duty of the circuit court judge, at least fifteen (15) days preceding the first day of the next term of the circuit court of the county in which the person is to be tried, to issue a writ of habeas corpus. The writ shall be directed to the county sheriff or keeper of the jail of the county in which the person may be committed, commanding the county sheriff or keeper of the jail to have the body of the person, together with the day and cause of the person's capture and detention, before the circuit court of the proper county for the trial of the offense on the first day of the next term of the circuit court.

It shall be the duty of the county sheriff or jailer to deliver, or cause to be delivered, the prisoner on the day and at the place mentioned in the writ.

Any county sheriff or jailer failing or neglecting to make return of the writ and have there the body of the person, according to the command of the writ, shall be deemed guilty of a contempt and shall be liable to be attached therefor. The county sheriff or jailer shall forfeit to the person or party any sum not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), to be recovered by the injured party by an action founded on this subchapter.

For committing the person and for executing such writ of habeas corpus, the county sheriff shall be entitled to the same fees as are provided by law for similar services.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 81, §§ 17-23; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6218-6224; Pope's Dig., §§ 8181-8187; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-413 — 46-419; Acts 1993, No. 456, § 1.

12-41-510. United States prisoners.

(1)It shall be the duty of the keeper of the jail in each county and of the keeper or warden at the penitentiary walls to receive into his or her custody all persons who may, from time to time, be committed to his or her custody under the authority of the United States.

The keeper of the jail shall safely keep every such prisoner according to the warrant or precept of such commitment until he or she shall be discharged by the due course of the laws of the United States.

The keeper of every jail shall be subject to the same penalties for any neglect or failure of duty provided for in this section as he or she would be subject to by the laws of this state for the like neglect or failure in case of a prisoner committed under the authority of the laws of this state.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 81, §§ 13-15; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6214-6216; Acts 1927, No. 366, § 3; Pope's Dig., §§ 8177-8179; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-409 — 46-411; Acts 1997, No. 1097, § 4.

12-41-511. Imprisonment of county sheriff.

The county sheriff may be imprisoned in the jail of his or her own county.

For the time the county sheriff shall be confined, the county coroner shall have the custody, rule, keeping, and charge of the jail and shall, by himself or herself and his or her securities, be answerable for the faithful discharge of his or her duties in that office.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 81, § 24; C. & M. Dig., § 6225; Pope's Dig., § 8188; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-420.

Subchapter 6

— County Jail Revenue Bond Act of 1981

12-41-601. Title.

This subchapter may be referred to and cited as the “County Jail Revenue Bond Act of 1981”.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-429.

12-41-602. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” means the county jail board established under the provisions of this subchapter;

“Bonds” means bonds and any series of bonds authorized by and issued pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter;

“Construct” means to acquire, construct, reconstruct, remodel, install, and equip any lands, buildings, structures, improvements, or other real, personal, or mixed property useful in connection with the county jail or jail facilities, and to make other necessary expenditures in connection therewith, by such methods and in such manner as may be authorized by law.

“Construct” also includes payment or provision for expenses incidental thereto;

“Expansion” means any additions, extensions, or improvements to the county jail or jail facilities and may include any necessary or appropriate remodeling and improvement to the present jail and its facilities, with appropriate equipment and furnishings, as determined by the board;

“Fees” means the fees authorized in this subchapter to be collected as additional costs in all convictions or any commitments to the county jail in the circuit court, probate division of circuit court, or district courts of the county;

“Jail” means the county jail and jail facilities of the county; and

“Pledged revenues” means all revenues authorized by this subchapter to be pledged for the security and payment of the bonds.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-430.

12-41-603. Construction.

This subchapter shall be construed liberally.

The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, and thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods, or things.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-441.

12-41-604. Adoption of ordinance.

Any county quorum court desiring to construct or expand county jail and jail facilities in the manner authorized in this subchapter may adopt an ordinance to establish a county jail board and authorize the board to issue revenue bonds to construct or expand the county jail or jail facilities in the manner authorized in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-432.

12-41-605. County jail boards.

Any county electing to issue county jail revenue bonds under the provisions of this subchapter shall, by ordinance adopted by the quorum court, establish a county jail board consisting of the county judge, the county sheriff, and the county clerk.

The county judge shall serve as chair of the board.

The board is authorized and empowered to:

Construct a county jail and jail facilities or provide for the expansion of the existing county jail or jail facilities on a site or sites selected by the board;

Arrange for the housing of prisoners during the period in which any of the facilities are undergoing construction or expansion;

Construct or cause to be constructed parking facilities to serve the county jail and jail facilities and the public having business therein;

Obtain the necessary funds for accomplishing the board's powers, purposes, and authorities;

Purchase, lease, or rent and receive bequests or donations of or otherwise acquire, sell, trade, or barter any real, personal, or mixed property and convert into money or property any property not needed or which cannot be used in its then current form;

Contract and be contracted with, apply for, receive, accept, and use any moneys and property from the United States Government, any state agency, any state or governmental body or political subdivision, any public or private corporation or organization of any nature, or any individual;

Invest and reinvest any of the board's moneys and securities as authorized by law; and

Take such other action, not inconsistent with law, as may be necessary and desirable to carry out the power, purposes, and authorities set forth in this subchapter and to carry out the intent of this subchapter.

The board is authorized to employ an architect to prepare the lands, specifications, and estimates of costs for the construction or expansion of the county jails and jail facilities and to supervise and inspect such construction.

In addition, the board is authorized to engage and pay professional, technical, and other help it shall deem to be necessary or desirable in assisting in effectively carrying out the powers, purposes, and authorities conferred and set forth in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, §§ 3, 12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-431, 46-440.

12-41-606. Bonds — Authority to issue.

The county jail board is authorized and empowered to issue bonds, at one (1) time or in series from time to time, and to use the proceeds thereof, together with any other funds, for financing the cost of construction or expansion of the county jail or jail facilities, together with all expenses incidental to and reasonably necessary in connection therewith, the expenses of the issuance of the bonds, the creating and maintenance of reserves to secure the payment of the bonds, if the board deems it necessary or desirable, and for providing for the payment of the interest on the bonds, if necessary or desirable, until sufficient funds are available therefor out of pledged revenues.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-434.

12-41-607. Bonds — Authorizing resolution.

The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the county jail board.

The authorizing resolution may contain any terms, covenants, and conditions that are deemed necessary or desirable by the board, including without limitation, those pertaining to:

The creation and maintenance of various funds and reserves;

The nature and extent of the security;

The issuance of additional series of bonds and the priority of lien and pledge in that event; and

The rights, duties, and obligations of the board and of the holders and registered owners of the bonds, all as the board shall determine.

The authorizing resolution may provide for the execution of a trust indenture, with a bank or trust company located within or without the State of Arkansas, containing the terms, covenants, and conditions authorized by this subchapter.

Be coupon bonds, payable to bearer, or be registrable as to the principal only, or be registrable as to both principal and interest;

Contain exchange provisions;

Be in a form and denomination as the board determines;

Have such date or dates as the board determines;

Be stated to mature at a time or times as the board determines;

Bear interest payable at times and at rate or rates as the board determines;

Be made payable at places within and without the State of Arkansas;

Be made subject to terms of redemption in advance of maturity at times and at prices as the board determines; and

Contain other terms and conditions as the board determines.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-434.

12-41-608. Bonds — Contract between parties — Enforcement.

Each authorizing resolution or trust indenture, together with this subchapter and the ordinance of the quorum court acting pursuant to this subchapter, shall constitute a contract by and between the county jail board and the holders and registered holders of the bonds issued pursuant to this subchapter.

The contract and all covenants, agreements, and obligations therein shall be properly performed in strict accordance with the terms and provisions thereof.

The covenants, agreements, and obligations of the board may be enforced by mandamus or other appropriate proceedings at law or in equity.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-437.

12-41-609. Bonds — Terms and conditions.

As the county jail board shall determine, the bonds may:

The bonds shall have all the qualities of negotiable instruments under the laws of the State of Arkansas, subject to provisions as to registration of ownerships as set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that it has been issued under the provisions of this subchapter and under the provisions of the ordinance of the quorum court authorizing the issuance thereof.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-434, 46-435.

12-41-610. Bonds — Sale.

The bonds may be sold in such manner and at such price, including sale at a discount, as the county jail board may accept.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-434.

12-41-611. Bonds — Coupons — Execution — Seal.

Bonds issued pursuant to this subchapter shall be executed by the chair of the county jail board and the secretary of the board by manual or facsimile signature with at least one (1) manual signature.

The coupons attached to the bonds shall be executed by the facsimile signature of the chair of the board.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be officers before the delivery of the bonds or coupons, their signature shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes.

Each bond shall be sealed with the seal of the board.

The principal of, premiums, if any, interest on, and trustee's and paying agent's fees in connection with the bonds shall be payable solely from the moneys in the county jail revenue bond fund and the moneys required by this subchapter to be deposited into the county jail revenue bond fund.

The board is directed to insert appropriate provisions in the authorizing resolution or trust indenture for the investment and reinvestment of moneys in the county jail revenue bond fund in securities selected by the board, and all income derived from such investments shall be and become part of the county jail revenue bond fund.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-434.

12-41-612. Bonds — Liability on.

Bonds issued pursuant to this subchapter shall be obligations only of the county jail board, and in no event shall they constitute any indebtedness for which the faith and credit of the county issuing the bonds or any of its revenues, or of the state or any of its revenues, as used in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20, are pledged.

The bonds shall not be secured by a mortgage or lien on any land, buildings, or property belonging to the county.

No member of the board shall be personally liable on the bonds or for any damages sustained by anyone in connection with any contracts entered into or action taken in carrying out the powers, purposes, or authority of this subchapter or of the ordinance adopted by the quorum court unless he or she shall have acted with a corrupt intent.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-435.

12-41-613. Bonds — Pledge of revenues — Funds.

The principal, premiums, if any, interest, and trustee's and paying agent's fees in connection with all bonds issued under this subchapter shall be secured by a lien on and pledge of the fee revenues and the gross revenues derived from the fees levied under the provisions of §12-41-617 [repealed].

Such pledged revenues are specifically declared to be cash funds, restricted in their use and dedicated and to be used solely as provided in this subchapter.

(1)There is created a fund designated “county jail revenue bond fund” to be maintained at a depository as shall be specified by the county jail board. The county jail revenue bond fund shall be a trust fund.

After the issuance of any bonds under this subchapter, the moneys in the county jail revenue bond fund shall be applied solely for the payment of the principal of, premiums, if any, interest on, trustee's and paying agent's fees in connection with the bonds at maturity and at redemption prior to maturity, except moneys that are withdrawn therefrom pursuant to the subsequent provisions of this section, all as shall be specified and subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the authorizing resolution or trust indenture.

The pledged revenue shall not be deposited into the county treasury but, as and when received, shall be deposited into the county jail revenue bond fund.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-436.

12-41-614. Bonds — Tax exemption.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter, and the interest thereon, shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxes, and this exemption shall include income, inheritance, and estate taxes.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 879, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-438.